District of Columbia statutes.
16-2310.01

Separation of young children detained prior to a hearing.

The Director of the Department of Human Services and the Director of Social Services shall ensure that each child at risk who is detained, however briefly, pursuant to section 16-2311(a)(2) or (b)(1) shall be physically separated at all times, except during transportation, from children or other detainees 13 years of age or older, from any child under the age of 13 who has been detained on the ground that there is probable cause to believe the child has committed a crime of violence, as defined in section 23-1331(4) , or in any other manner deemed to ensure the safety of the child. Neither the Department of Human Services nor the Director of Social Services shall deliver a child under the age of 13 to the custody of the United States Marshals Service. For the purposes of this section, “child at risk” means a child under the age of 13 or any child 13 years of age or older who, because of his or her size or physical stature, is determined to be especially physically or psychologically vulnerable to attacks by other children.

Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-140, § 2(c), 33 DCR 3827
This section is referenced in § 16-2311.01.
1981 Ed., § 16-2310.1.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of the Juvenile Speedy Trial Equity Temporary Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-139, March 26, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4470).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Juvenile Speedy Trial Equity Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-235, December 27, 2007, 55 DCR 240).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Juvenile Speedy Trail Equity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-315, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3408).
Section 28(c)(2) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-2310.1 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-2310.01.